Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1717
Sheriff; deputy; uniform; badge, display; exceptions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, county sheriffs and their deputies, when on duty, shall:

(a) Be dressed in a distinctive uniform that is approved by the sheriff and that meets the requirements of section 23-1719; and

(b) Display a badge of office as described in section 23-1719.

(2) The wearing of such uniform and badge shall be discretionary at the option of the sheriff when he or she or his or her deputies are engaged in special investigations or mental patient assignments.

(3) Special deputies appointed by the sheriff shall be excluded from the requirements of this section.

Laws 1967, c. 113, § 1, p. 361;

Laws 1981, LB 186, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB784, § 3.
July 18, 2026